Washington statutes.
RCW 19.146.237

Director—Powers under chapter 19.144 RCW.

The director or the director's designee may take such action as provided for in this chapter to enforce, investigate, or examine persons covered by chapter 19.144 RCW.

[ 2008 c 108 s 14.]

NOTES:

Findings—2008 c 108: See RCW 19.144.005.